Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 5. Forgery and Related Offenses.

Collateral references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d, Counterfeiting, § 1 et seq.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Forgery, § 1 et seq.

20 C.J.S., Counterfeiting, §§ 4-13

37 C.J.S., Forgery, § 1 et seq.

Fictitious or assumed name, forgery by use of, 49 ALR2d 852.

Stolen money or property as subject of larceny or robbery,
89 ALR2d 1435.

Procuring signature by fraud as forgery, 11 ALR3d 1074.

Criminal liability under state laws in connection with application for, or receipt of, public relief or welfare payments, 80 ALR3d 1280; 22 ALR4th 534.

What constitutes ratification of unauthorized signature under UCC § 3-404, 93 ALR3d 967.

Admissibility of evidence as to linguistics or typing style (forensic linguistics) as basis of identification of typist or author, 36 ALR4th 598.

What constitutes a public record or document within statute making falsification, forgery, mutilation, removal, or other misuse thereof an offense, 75 ALR4th 1067.

Signing Credit Charge, Credit Sales Slip, or Credit Electronic Point of Sale Terminal, as Forgery, 80 ALR6th 599

Sec. 11.46.500.
Forgery in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of forgery in the first degree if the person violates AS

11.46.510

and the written instrument is or purports to be

part of an issue of money, securities, postage, revenue stamps, or other valuable instruments issued by a government or governmental agency; or

part of an issue of stock, bonds, or other instruments representing interests in or claims against an organization or its property.

Forgery in the first degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.46.505.
Forgery in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of forgery in the second degree if the person violates AS

11.46.510

and the instrument is or purports to be

a deed, will, codicil, contract, assignment, negotiable or other commercial instrument, or other document which does or may evidence, create, transfer, alter, terminate, or otherwise affect a legal right, interest, obligation, or status; or

a public record.

Forgery in the second degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.46.510.
Forgery in the third degree.

A person commits the crime of forgery in the third degree if, with intent to defraud, the person

falsely makes, completes, or alters a written instrument;

knowingly possesses a forged instrument; or

knowingly utters a forged instrument.

Forgery in the third degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “falsely alter,” “falsely complete,” “falsely make,” “forged instrument,” “utter,” “written instrument” — AS

11.46.580

Definition of “government,” “organization,” “property,” “possess,” “public record” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Criminal possession of a forgery device — AS

11.46.520

Theft defined — AS

11.46.100

Original Code Provision — AS 11.25.010; AS 11.25.020; AS 11.20.380; AS 11.20.430; AS 11.20.440; AS 11.25.060; AS 11.25.070.

TD: III, 86-89.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.46.520.
Criminal possession of a forgery device.

A person commits the crime of criminal possession of a forgery device if, with intent to use it or aid another to use it for purposes of forgery, the person makes or possesses

a plate, die, or other device, apparatus, equipment, or article specifically designed for use in forging written instruments; or

a device, apparatus, equipment, or article capable of or adaptable for purposes of forgery.

Criminal possession of a forgery device is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “written instrument” — AS

11.46.580(b)(3)

Definition of “intentionally,” “possess” — AS

11.81.900

Original Code Provision — AS 11.25.030

TD: III, 90-91.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.46.530.
Criminal simulation.

A person commits the crime of criminal simulation if,

with intent to defraud, the person makes or alters any object in such a manner that it appears to have a rarity, age, source, or authorship that it does not in fact possess; or

with knowledge of its true character and with intent to defraud, the person possesses or utters an object so simulated.

Criminal simulation is

a class C felony if the value of what the object purports to represent is $750 or more;

a class A misdemeanor if the value of what the object purports to represent is $250 or more but less than $750;

a class B misdemeanor if the value of what the object purports to represent is less than $250.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 17 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 21 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 14 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 30 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intent to defraud” — AS

11.46.990

Definition of “utter” — AS

11.46.580(b)(2)

Definition of “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “possess” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Determination of value; aggregation of amounts — AS

11.46.980

Offenses defined by age or value — AS

11.81.615

Theft by deception — AS

11.46.180

Scheme to defraud — AS

11.46.600

Original Code Provision — AS 11.25.120; AS 11.25.130.

TD: III, 91-92.

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment for class C felonies, AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment for class B misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (b), see sec. 185(a)(16), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (b), see sec. 75(a)(13), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (b)(1) and (2), inserted “adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” after “represent” and substituted “$1,000” for “$750”; in (b)(3), inserted “adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” after “represent”.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (b)(1) and (2), substituted “$750” for “$1,000”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “purports to represent” in (b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(3).

Editor's notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (b) as amended by sec. 17, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (b) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.46.540.
Obtaining a signature by deception.

A person commits the crime of obtaining a signature by deception if, with intent to defraud, the person causes another to sign or execute a written instrument by deception.

Obtaining a signature by deception is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intent to defraud” — AS

11.46.990

(11)

Definition of “written instrument” — AS

11.46.580(b)(3)

Definition of deception — AS

11.81.900(b)

Theft by deception — AS

11.46.180

Original Code Provision — AS

11.20.360

TD: III, 92-93.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Collateral references. —

Procuring signature by fraud as forgery, 11 ALR3d 1074.

Construction and application of federal witness tampering statute,
18 U.S.C.A. § 1512(b).
185 ALR Fed. 1.

Sec. 11.46.550.
Offering a false instrument for recording in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of offering a false instrument for recording in the first degree if, knowing that a written instrument relating to or affecting property or directly affecting a contractual relationship contains a false statement or false information, and with intent to defraud, the person presents or offers it to a public office or a public servant intending that it be registered, filed, or recorded or become a part of the records of that public office or public servant.

Offering a false instrument for recording in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 20 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

Definition of “written instrument” — AS

11.46.580(b)(3)

Definition of “intent to defraud” — AS

11.46.990

(11)

Definition of “property,” “public servant” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Forgery in the first, second and third degree — AS

11.46.500

—

11.46.510

Theft by deception — AS

11.46.180

Scheme to defraud — AS

11.46.600

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.270.

TD: III, 94.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Opinions of attorney general. —

When an official of a land title company seeking to file a warranty deed in Alaska, in the presence of the recorder altered a California notary clause to change the name and title of the person that the California notary public swore had appeared before her, the alteration may well have violated this section.
December 22, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 11.46.560.
Offering a false instrument for recording in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of offering a false instrument for recording in the second degree if

under AS 40.17, the person presents a lien to the recorder for registration, filing, or recording with reckless disregard that the lien is not

provided for by a specific state or federal statute or municipal ordinance; or

a lien imposed or authorized by a court recognized under state or federal law;

under a law authorizing the receipt and filing of a document, the person presents a lien to a department or person having responsibility to accept a lien for filing with reckless disregard that the lien is not

provided for by a specific state or federal statute or municipal ordinance; or

a lien imposed or authorized by a court recognized under state or federal law; or

the person presents to the recorder a notice of the pendency of an action affecting title to real property or the right to possession of real property with reckless disregard of the fact that the action specified does not concern the title to or right to possession of the real property referred to in the notice, or with reckless disregard of the fact that there is no pending action concerning the title to or right to possession of the real property referred to in the notice.

In a prosecution under (a) of this section, it is an affirmative defense that the owner of the property affected has consented in writing to the lien or the filing of the notice.

In this section,

“lien” means an encumbrance on property as security for the payment of a debt;

“recorder” means the commissioner of the Department of Natural Resources or the person designated by the commissioner of natural resources to perform the duties set out in AS 40.17.

Offering a false instrument for recording in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 20 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 27 SLA 2005; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective June 13, 2017, added “or municipal ordinance” at the end of (a)(1)(A) and at the end of (a)(2)(A).

Sec. 11.46.565.
Criminal impersonation in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of criminal impersonation in the first degree if the person

possesses an access device or identification document of another person;

without authorization of the other person, uses the access device or identification document of another person to obtain a false identification document, open an account at a financial institution, obtain an access device, or obtain property or services; and

recklessly damages the financial reputation of the other person.

Criminal impersonation in the first degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 65 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.46.570.
Criminal impersonation in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of criminal impersonation in the second degree if the person

assumes a false identity and does an act in the assumed character with intent to defraud, commit a crime, or obtain a benefit to which the person is not entitled; or

pretends to be a representative of some person or organization and does an act in the pretended capacity with intent to defraud, commit a crime, or obtain a benefit to which the person is not entitled.

Criminal impersonation in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 7 ch 65 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intent to defraud” — AS

11.46.990

(11)

Definition of “organization” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Impersonating a public servant — AS

11.56.830

Theft by deception — AS

11.46.180

Scheme to defraud — AS

11.46.600

Original Code Provision — AS 11.20.200; AS 11.20.450; AS 11.20.500; AS 11.20.410.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see
AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and
AS

12.55.035

for fines..

For impersonating a public servant, see AS

11.56.830

.

Sec. 11.46.580.
Definitions.

In AS

11.46.500

—

11.46.580

, unless the context requires otherwise,

to “falsely alter” a written instrument means to change, without authorization by anyone entitled to grant it, a written instrument, whether complete or incomplete, by means of erasure, obliteration, deletion, insertion of new matter, transposition of matter, or any other manner, so that the instrument so altered falsely appears or purports to be in all respects an authentic creation of its ostensible maker or authorized by the ostensible maker;

to “falsely complete” a written instrument means to transform, by adding, inserting, or changing matter, an incomplete written instrument into a complete one without the authority of anyone entitled to grant it, so that the complete written instrument falsely appears or purports to be in all respects an authentic creation of its ostensible maker or authorized by the ostensible maker;

to “falsely make” a written instrument means to make or draw a complete or incomplete written instrument which purports to be an authentic creation of its ostensible maker, but which is not, either because the ostensible maker is fictitious or because, if real, the ostensible maker did not authorize the making or drawing of the instrument.

In AS

11.46.500

—

11.46.580

,

“forged instrument” means a written instrument which has been falsely made, completed, or altered;

“utter” means to issue, deliver, publish, circulate, disseminate, transfer, or tender a written instrument or other object to another;

“written instrument” means a paper, document, instrument, electronic recording, or article containing written or printed matter or the equivalent, whether complete or incomplete, used for the purpose of reciting, embodying, conveying, or recording information or constituting a symbol or evidence of value, right, privilege, or identification, which is capable of being used to the advantage or disadvantage of some person.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For definition of terms used in this chapter, see AS

11.46.990

.